New York, session 2025-2026, S6477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, with- 2 in cities having a population of one million or more, methadone program 3 facilities registered with the office of addiction services and supports 4 pursuant to section 19.16 of the mental hygiene law within each such 5 city shall be sited, constructed and/or established throughout the 6 boroughs of such city in proportion to each borough's population to the 7 city's total population. Provided, however, that the provisions of this 8 section shall not apply to the siting, construction or establishment of 9 any methadone program facility for which the appropriate community board 10 or, if there be no community board, the appropriate neighborhood board 11 shall have granted an exemption from such provisions. 12 § 2. Methadone program facilities sited, constructed and/or estab- 13 lished within cities having a population of one million or more after 14 the effective date of this act shall be first located in those boroughs 15 of the city which have the lowest concentration of such facilities in 16 proportion to the borough population to the city's population. Once each 17 borough has achieved proper proportionality pursuant to this section, 18 siting, construction, and/or establishment of such facilities shall 19 continue within a city having a population of one million or more with 20 such proportionality requirements in mind. 21 § 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no 22 methadone program facility shall be sited, constructed or established EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07094-01-5 S. 6477 2 1 within a city having a population of one million or more unless the 2 appropriate community board, or, if there be no community board, the 3 appropriate neighborhood board shall have approved the siting, 4 construction or establishment of such facility. 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.